Wyoming, session 2026, SF0111.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-11-801 is created to read:

ARTICLE 8
SELECT COMMITTEE ON GAMING

28-11-801. Appointment of members; powers and duties.

SF0111

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0497
(a) Not later than March 15 following each general
election, a select committee on gaming shall be appointed,
subject to the following:

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint
three (3) members of the senate apportioned as nearly as
possible to reflect the percentage of the elected
membership of the majority and minority parties of the
senate, provided not more than two (2) of the members shall
be from the same political party. The president of the
senate shall designate a co-chairman of the select
committee from the members appointed under this paragraph;

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives
shall appoint three (3) members of the house apportioned as
nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected
membership of the majority and minority parties of the
house, provided not more than two (2) of the members shall
be from the same political party. The speaker of the house
shall designate a co-chairman of the select committee from
the members appointed under this paragraph.

(b) The select committee shall:
SF0111

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0497

(i) Develop knowledge and expertise regarding
gaming activities authorized or proposed under Wyoming law,
including the statutory framework governing gaming and the
structure and jurisdiction of entities responsible for
regulation and enforcement;

(ii) Engage with local governments, communities
and interested parties regarding gaming activities and
related social and community impacts, including responsible
gaming and problem gambling;

(iii) Review fiscal and compliance matters
related to gaming activities, including taxes, fees,
revenue distribution and applicable auditing and reporting
requirements;

(iv) Prepare and submit recommendations to the
legislature, including sponsoring legislation as necessary.

Section 2. Within thirty (30) days after the
effective date of this act, the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
SF0111

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0497
members to the initial select committee on gaming in
accordance with the requirements of W.S. 28-11-801(a), as
created by this act.

Section 3. There is appropriated thirty-four thousand
dollars ($34,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for purposes of providing
salary, including salary for the chairmen under W.S.
28-5-101(e)(i), mileage and per diem to members of the
select committee on gaming, created by this act, and for
other expenses of the select committee authorized by law or
policy of the legislature. This appropriation shall be for
the period beginning with the effective date of this act
and ending June 30, 2028.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0111